Mississippi, session 2026, SB3315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to Marshall County for the purpose of defraying costs associated with the purchase of equipment needed by any Marshall County fire service for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027....................................................... .................................................. $ 500,000.00. SECTION 2.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act be drawn first from any funds remaining from those funds appropriated to Marshall County by Section 28(ih) of Chapter 549, Laws of 2023. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.